South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4660.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 33-14-107(c) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (c) If the dissolved corporation publishes a newspaper notice in accordance with subsection (b), the claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences a proceeding to enforce the claim against the dissolved corporation within tenfive years after the publication date of the newspaper notice: (1) a claimant who did not receive written notice pursuant to Section 33-14-106; (2) a claimant whose claim was timely sent to the dissolved corporation but not acted on; and (3) a claimant whose claim is contingent or based on an event occurring after the effective date of the dissolution. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----